Utah statutes.
32A-12-203.   Unlawful sale or furnishing to minors.
(1)  A person may not sell, offer to sell, or otherwise furnish any alcoholic
beverage or product to any minor.
(2) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), a person is guilty of
a class B misdemeanor if that person:
(i)  sells, offers to sell, or otherwise furnishes any alcoholic beverage or
product to any minor; and
(ii)  negligently or recklessly fails to determine whether the recipient of
the alcoholic beverage or product is a minor.
(b)  As used in this Subsection (2), "negligently" means with simple
negligence.
(3)  Except as otherwise provided in Subsection (4), a person who sells,
offers to sell, or otherwise furnishes any alcoholic beverage or product to
any minor knowing that the recipient of the alcoholic beverage or product is a
minor is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
(4)  This section does not apply to the furnishing of an alcoholic beverage or
product to a minor in accordance with this title:
(a)  for medicinal purposes by:
(i)  the parent or guardian of the minor; or
(ii)  the minor's physician or dentist; or
(b)  as part of a church's or religious organization's religious services.
